Missouri, session 2026, SB1682.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.480, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
191.479, 191.480, and 630.1170, to read as follows:
191.479. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Bona fide physician-patient relationship", a
relationship between a physician and a patient in which the
physician:
(a) Has completed an assessment of the patient's
medical history and current medical condition, including an
in-person examination of the patient;
(b) Has consulted with the patient with respect to the
patient's medical condition; and
(c) Is available to provide follow-up care and
treatment to the patient;
(2) "Facilitator", an individual who is present with a
person who uses psilocybin in order to facilitate the
therapeutic use of the psilocybin for the person;
(3) "First responder", the same meaning as in section
67.145;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1682 2
(4) "Veteran", any person defined as a veteran by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its
successor agency.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 195 or
579 or any other provision of law to the contrary, any
person who acquires, uses, produces, possesses, transfers,
or administers psilocybin for the person's own therapeutic
use shall not be in violation of state or local law and
shall not be subject to a civil fine, penalty, or sanction
so long as the following conditions are met:
(1) The person is a veteran or a first responder and
is twenty-one years of age or older;
(2) The person suffers from posttraumatic stress
disorder, major depressive disorder, or a substance use
disorder or requires end-of-life care;
(3) The person has enrolled in a study on the use of
psilocybin to treat posttraumatic stress disorder, major
depressive disorder, or substance use disorders or for end-
of-life care;
(4) The person informs the department of mental health
that the person plans to acquire, use, produce, possess,
transfer, or administer psilocybin in accordance with this
section;
(5) The person provides the department of mental
health with:
(a) Documentation from a physician with whom the
patient has a bona fide physician-patient relationship that
the person suffers from posttraumatic stress disorder, major
depressive disorder, or a substance use disorder or requires
end-of-life care;
(b) The name of the individual who will serve as the
person's facilitator;

SB 1682 3
(c) The address of the location where the use of
psilocybin will take place; and
(d) The time period, not to exceed twelve months,
during which the person will use psilocybin;
(6) The person's use of psilocybin occurs only in the
presence of a facilitator who meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is:
a. A licensed physician;
b. A licensed mental health professional who earned a
doctor of psychology degree or a doctor of philosophy degree
in psychology;
c. A mental health therapist who has a master's degree
in a relevant field and who has full clinical licensure
including, but not limited to, a licensed clinical social
worker, a licensed marital and family therapist, a licensed
professional counselor, or an art therapist;
d. A licensed nurse who holds a doctorate in nursing
practice;
e. A licensed physician assistant;
f. A psychiatric mental health nurse practitioner; or
g. A licensed advanced practice registered nurse;
(b) Has completed a training program that is specific
to psilocybin and that:
a. Is consistent with the current professional
practice guidelines for psychedelic-assisted therapy
published by the American Psychological Association or the
American Psychedelic Practitioners Association and complies
with each such guideline;
b. Covers all content areas set forth in the
professional practice guidelines of the American

SB 1682 4
Psychological Association or the American Psychedelic
Practitioners Association; and
c. Consists of at least thirty hours of synchronous
learning;
(c) Except for psychiatrists, psychiatric mental
health nurse practitioners, and holders of a doctorate
degree in psychology, completes ninety minutes of continuing
education on the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders before serving as a facilitator for any person and
during each relevant licensure renewal period; and
(d) Has received training in end-of-life care or in
one or more of the following diagnostic categories:
a. Posttraumatic stress disorder;
b. Complex posttraumatic stress disorder;
c. Major depressive disorder; or
d. Substance use disorder;
(7) The person ensures that a laboratory licensed by
the state to test controlled substances tests the psilocybin
the person intends to ingest; and
100 (8) The person limits the use of psilocybin to no more
101 than one hundred fifty milligrams of psilocybin analyte (4-
102 phosphoryloxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine) during any twelve-
103 month period.
104 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 195 or
105 579 or any other provision of law to the contrary:
106 (1) Any person twenty-one years of age or older who
107 assists another person in any of the acts allowed under
108 subsection 2 of this section shall not be in violation of
109 state or local law and shall not be subject to a civil fine,
110 penalty, or sanction; and
111 (2) Any laboratory licensed by the state to test
112 controlled substances or cannabis that tests psilocybin for

SB 1682 5
113 a person engaged in acts allowed under subsection 2 of this
114 section shall not be in violation of state or local law and
115 shall not be subject to a civil fine, penalty, or sanction.
116 4. Subject to appropriation, the department of mental
117 health shall provide grants totaling two million dollars for
118 research on the use and efficacy of psilocybin for persons
119 described in subsection 2 of this section.
120 5. The department of mental health shall prepare and
121 submit to the governor, lieutenant governor, and the general
122 assembly annual reports on any information collected by the
123 department on the implementation and outcomes of the use of
124 psilocybin as described in subsection 2 of this section.
125 6. The department of mental health shall maintain the
126 confidentiality of any personally identifiable protected
127 information collected from any persons who provide
128 information to the department under subsection 2 of this
129 section.
130 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
131 contrary, the department of mental health, any health care
132 providers, and any other person involved in the acts
133 described in subsection 2 of this section shall not be
134 subject to criminal or civil liability or sanction under the
135 laws of this state for providing care to a person engaged in
136 acts allowed under subsection 2 of this section, except in
137 cases of gross negligence or willful misconduct. No health
138 care provider shall be subject to discipline against his or
139 her professional license for providing care to a person
140 engaged in acts allowed under subsection 2 of this section.
141 8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
142 contrary, a physician shall not be subject to criminal or
143 civil liability or sanction under the laws of this state for
144 providing documentation that a person suffers from

SB 1682 6
145 posttraumatic stress disorder, major depressive disorder, or
146 a substance use disorder or requires end-of-life care, and
147 no state agency or regulatory board shall revoke, fail to
148 renew, or take any other action against a physician's
149 license issued under chapter 334 based solely on the
150 physician's provision of documentation that a person suffers
151 from posttraumatic stress disorder, major depressive
152 disorder, or a substance use disorder or requires end-of-
153 life care.
154 9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
155 contrary, no state agency or employee of a state agency
156 shall disclose to the federal government, any federal
157 government employee, or any unauthorized third party the
158 statewide list or any individual information of persons who
159 meet the requirements of this section.
191.480. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible patient", a person who meets all of the
following:
(a) Has a terminal condition or illness, a life-
threatening condition or illness, or a severely debilitating
condition or illness;
(b) Has considered all other treatment options
currently approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and all relevant clinical trials conducted in
this state;
(c) Has received a prescription or recommendation from
the person's physician for an investigational drug,
biological product, or device;
(d) Has given written informed consent which shall be
at least as comprehensive as the consent used in clinical
trials for the use of the investigational drug, biological

SB 1682 7
product, or device or, if the patient is a minor or lacks
the mental capacity to provide informed consent, a parent or
legal guardian has given written informed consent on the
patient's behalf; and
(e) Has documentation from the person's physician that
the person has met the requirements of this subdivision;
(2) "Investigational drug, biological product, or
device", a drug, biological product, or device, any of which
are used to treat the patient's terminal condition or
illness, life-threatening condition or illness, or severely
debilitating condition or illness, that has successfully
completed phase one of a clinical trial but has not been
approved for general use by the United States Food and Drug
Administration and remains under investigation in a clinical
trial[. The term shall not include Schedule I controlled
substances];
(3) "Life-threatening condition or illness", a disease
or condition:
(a) In which the likelihood of death is high unless
the course of the disease is interrupted; and
(b) With potentially fatal outcomes, where the end
point of clinical trial analysis is survival;
(4) "Severely debilitating condition or illness", a
disease or condition that causes major irreversible
morbidity;
(5) "Terminal condition or illness", a disease or
condition that without life-sustaining procedures will
result in death in the near future or a state of permanent
unconsciousness from which recovery is unlikely.
2. A manufacturer of an investigational drug,
biological product, or device may make available the
manufacturer's investigational drug, biological product, or

SB 1682 8
device to eligible patients under this section. This
section does not require that a manufacturer make available
an investigational drug, biological product, or device to an
eligible patient. A manufacturer may:
(1) Provide an investigational drug, biological
product, or device to an eligible patient without receiving
compensation; or
(2) Require an eligible patient to pay the costs of or
associated with the manufacture of the investigational drug,
biological product, or device.
3. This section does not require a health care insurer
to provide coverage for the cost of any investigational
drug, biological product, or device. A health care insurer
may provide coverage for an investigational drug, biological
product, or device.
4. This section does not require the department of
corrections to provide coverage for the cost of any
investigational drug, biological product, or device.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, no state agency or regulatory board shall revoke,
fail to renew, or take any other action against a
physician's license issued under chapter 334 based solely on
the physician's recommendation to an eligible patient
regarding prescription for or treatment with an
investigational drug, biological product, or device. Action
against a health care provider's Medicare certification
based solely on the health care provider's recommendation
that a patient have access to an investigational drug,
biological product, or device is prohibited.
6. If a provision of this section or its application
to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications

SB 1682 9
of this section that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this section are severable.
7. If the clinical trial is closed due to lack of
efficacy or toxicity, the drug shall not be offered. If
notice is given on a drug, product, or device taken by a
patient outside of a clinical trial, the pharmaceutical
company or patient's physician shall notify the patient of
the information from the safety committee of the clinical
trial.
8. Except in the case of gross negligence or willful
misconduct, any person who manufactures, imports,
distributes, prescribes, dispenses, or administers an
investigational drug or device to an eligible patient [with
a terminal illness] in accordance with this section shall
not be liable in any action under state law for any loss,
damage, or injury arising out of, relating to, or resulting
from:
100 (1) The design, development, clinical testing and
101 investigation, manufacturing, labeling, distribution, sale,
102 purchase, donation, dispensing, prescription,
103 administration, or use of the drug or device; or
104 (2) The safety or effectiveness of the drug or device.
630.1170. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of
chapter 195 or 579 to the contrary, the department of mental
health, in collaboration with a hospital operated by an
institution of higher education in this state or with
contract research organizations conducting studies approved
by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, shall conduct a
study on the efficacy of using alternative medicine and
therapies, including the use of psilocybin, in the treatment
of veterans who suffer from posttraumatic stress disorder,

SB 1682 10
major depressive disorder, or substance use disorders or who
require end-of-life care.
2. (1) In conducting the study, the department of
mental health, in collaboration with the hospital or
contract research organizations described in subsection 1 of
this section and subject to appropriation, shall:
(a) Perform a study on the therapeutic efficacy of
using psilocybin in the treatment of veterans and first
responders who suffer from posttraumatic stress disorder,
major depressive disorder, or substance use disorders or who
require end-of-life care; and
(b) Review current literature regarding:
a. The safety and efficacy of psilocybin in the
treatment of veterans and first responders who suffer from
posttraumatic stress disorder, major depressive disorder, or
substance use disorders or who require end-of-life care; and
b. The access that veterans and first responders have
to psilocybin for such treatment.
(2) The department of mental health shall prepare and
submit to the governor, lieutenant governor, and the general
assembly the following:
(a) Quarterly reports on the progress of the study; and
(b) A written report, submitted one year following the
commencement of the study, that shall:
a. Contain the results of the study and any
recommendations for legislative or regulatory action; and
b. Highlight those clinical practices that appear to
be most successful as well as any safety or health concerns.
3. The department of mental health shall maintain the
confidentiality of any personally identifiable protected
information collected during the study under this section.

SB 1682 11
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the department of mental health, any health care
providers, and any other person involved in the study under
this section shall not be subject to criminal or civil
liability or sanction under the laws of this state for
participating in the study, except in cases of gross
negligence or willful misconduct. No health care provider
shall be subject to discipline against his or her
professional license for participation in the study.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, a physician shall not be subject to criminal or
civil liability or sanction under the laws of this state for
referring a veteran to the study under this section, and no
state agency or regulatory board shall revoke, fail to
renew, or take any other action against a physician's
license issued under chapter 334 based solely on the
physician's referral of a veteran or a first responder to
the study under this section.
✓